District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-2303.11

Denial, revocation, and suspension of registration or certificate of registration

Repealed.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 1104(g), 33 DCR 729
1981 Ed., §§ 2-1703.1 to 2-1703.21.